public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A r risense [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A r risense [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A r risense [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A r risense [bdfmnptvx]iar
SFX A r risense [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A r risense [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A r risense [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A r risense [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A r risense [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A r risense [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r risense [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A r risense [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A r risense [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A r risense [bln]uir
SFX A r risense [blprsvx]ear
SFX A r risense [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A r risense [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A r risense [bou]rogar
SFX A r risense [bp]erlar
SFX A r risense [btv]ergar
SFX A r risense [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A r risense [cfgjlmsxđ]ir
SFX A r risense [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A r risense [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A r risense [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A r risense [dg]obar
SFX A r risense [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A r risense [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A r risense [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A r risense [dltv]ernar
SFX A r risense [ds]oler
SFX A r risense [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A r risense [eilox]mar
SFX A r risense [einoru]xar
SFX A r risense [einosu]car
SFX A r risense [eiu]xurar
SFX A r risense [eo]liđar
SFX A r risense [eo]ntiđar
SFX A r risense [es]kotar
SFX A r risense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A r risense [fjkx]ermar
SFX A r risense [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A r risense [fm]eretar
SFX A r risense [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A r risense [fsx]ierir
SFX A r risense [ft]erdir
SFX A r risense [fŧ]etuar
SFX A r risense [gin]ritar
SFX A r risense [iln]trar
SFX A r risense [inru]jar
SFX A r risense [io]ntar
SFX A r risense [io]rkolar
SFX A r risense [ipt]ađar
SFX A r risense [ipu]lar
SFX A r risense [irst]umar
SFX A r risense [klt]ivar
SFX A r risense [kp]avejar
SFX A r risense [kt]erŧar
SFX A r risense [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A r risense [ln]etrar
SFX A r risense [lnoru]đar
SFX A r risense [mp]eritar
SFX A r risense [mv]ergolar
SFX A r risense [no]struir
SFX A r risense [nr]guir
SFX A r risense [ns]erbar
SFX A r risense [ns]ervar
SFX A r risense [ns]kuercar
SFX A r risense [nsv]edar
SFX A r risense [nx]goŧar
SFX A r risense [op]ar
SFX A r risense [ox]longar
SFX A r risense [pt]erveñir
SFX A r risense [pt]resar
SFX A r risense [pt]rotar
SFX A r risense [stŧ]imentar
SFX A r risense [sŧ]erkar
SFX A r risense [tuv]iliđar
SFX A r risense [tv]eriđar
SFX A r risense [tv]erniđar
SFX A r risense [tv]oler
SFX A r risense [xŧ]ertar
SFX A r risense alar
SFX A r risense aler
SFX A r risense alienar
SFX A r risense amar
SFX A r risense arar
SFX A r risense arveñir
SFX A r risense aver
SFX A r risense bersajar
SFX A r risense bertonar
SFX A r risense bordeđar
SFX A r risense dar
SFX A r risense deramar
SFX A r risense derenar
SFX A r risense derivar
SFX A r risense derobar
SFX A r risense derokar
SFX A r risense derokir
SFX A r risense derotar
SFX A r risense desavir
SFX A r risense desferenŧiar
SFX A r risense devorar
SFX A r risense devorŧiar
SFX A r risense dexeredar
SFX A r risense dexverxenar
SFX A r risense dir
SFX A r risense donar
SFX A r risense exerŧitar
SFX A r risense far
SFX A r risense fermentar
SFX A r risense fumar
SFX A r risense griliar
SFX A r risense guernar
SFX A r risense inbaretar
SFX A r risense infervorar
SFX A r risense inkartonar
SFX A r risense intarsiar
SFX A r risense interesar
SFX A r risense interiŧir
SFX A r risense interkalar
SFX A r risense interkuerar
SFX A r risense interkuirar
SFX A r risense interlinear
SFX A r risense interlokuir
SFX A r risense intermeđar
SFX A r risense interogar
SFX A r risense interpretar
SFX A r risense intiriŧir
SFX A r risense inveriar
SFX A r risense inversiar
SFX A r risense inŧercelar
SFX A r risense kalar
SFX A r risense kalefar
SFX A r risense kantar
SFX A r risense karpir
SFX A r risense kolar
SFX A r risense korniđar
SFX A r risense koñer
SFX A r risense kriolar
SFX A r risense kurvar
SFX A r risense lotar
SFX A r risense lumar
SFX A r risense lustrar
SFX A r risense maravejar
SFX A r risense menar
SFX A r risense meravejar
SFX A r risense merkantar
SFX A r risense merkantiđar
SFX A r risense međar
SFX A r risense mojar
SFX A r risense mudarar
SFX A r risense ojar
SFX A r risense okar
SFX A r risense ormeđar
SFX A r risense parer
SFX A r risense perdonar
SFX A r risense perfumar
SFX A r risense perifraxar
SFX A r risense periodar
SFX A r risense perkolar
SFX A r risense perkotar
SFX A r risense perletar
SFX A r risense perlustrar
SFX A r risense permaner
SFX A r risense permudarar
SFX A r risense permutar
SFX A r risense perorar
SFX A r risense perpetrar
SFX A r risense perpetuar
SFX A r risense perseguir
SFX A r risense perseguitar
SFX A r risense personaliđar
SFX A r risense persugar
SFX A r risense pertegar
SFX A r risense pervertir
SFX A r risense poder
SFX A r risense pongar
SFX A r risense rajar
SFX A r risense ramar
SFX A r risense raxar
SFX A r risense redar
SFX A r risense remaner
SFX A r risense rigolar
SFX A r risense rivar
SFX A r risense robar
SFX A r risense roersar
SFX A r risense rokir
SFX A r risense rolar
SFX A r risense sajar
SFX A r risense scantiđar
SFX A r risense seguir
SFX A r risense seguitar
SFX A r risense serajar
SFX A r risense servir
SFX A r risense siar
SFX A r risense skortegar
SFX A r risense sotolinear
SFX A r risense soverkiar
SFX A r risense spergoŧar
SFX A r risense sperimentar
SFX A r risense sperlongar
SFX A r risense spernacar
SFX A r risense speronar
SFX A r risense sperđurar
SFX A r risense steriliđar
SFX A r risense sugar
SFX A r risense superbir
SFX A r risense terapienar
SFX A r risense teraŧar
SFX A r risense termenar
SFX A r risense terminar
SFX A r risense terŧariolar
SFX A r risense teñir
SFX A r risense tonar
SFX A r risense tormentar
SFX A r risense tuar
SFX A r risense tuir
SFX A r risense vejar
SFX A r risense velar
SFX A r risense verdeđar
SFX A r risense vergiđar
SFX A r risense vergoñar
SFX A r risense verifegar
SFX A r risense verigolar
SFX A r risense verolar
SFX A r risense versar
SFX A r risense vertir
SFX A r risense verxurar
SFX A r risense verđelar
SFX A r risense veñir
SFX A r risense xberlefar
SFX A r risense xberlotar
SFX A r risense xberlumar
SFX A r risense xberxelar
SFX A r risense xeguir
SFX A r risense xelar
SFX A r risense xermojar
SFX A r risense xgoñar
SFX A r risense xlargiđar
SFX A r risense xmerdar
SFX A r risense xmerejar
SFX A r risense xmeriliar
SFX A r risense xmerŧiar
SFX A r risense xmorgolar
SFX A r risense xnervađar
SFX A r risense xufruir
SFX A r risense xvergoñaŧar
SFX A r risense đurar
SFX A r risense ŧercar
SFX A r risense ŧernir
SFX A r risense ŧerpir
SFX A r risense ŧirkuir
SFX A r risense ŧitar
SFX A r risense ŧokir
SFX A r rision/L [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A r rision/L [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A r rision/L [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A r rision/L [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A r rision/L [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A r rision/L [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A r rision/L [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A r rision/L [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A r rision/L [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A r rision/L [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A r rision/L [abfgptu]regar
SFX A r rision/L [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A r rision/L [abfkx]renar
SFX A r rision/L [abfot]raŧar
SFX A r rision/L [abik]rokar
SFX A r rision/L [abikoptu]riar
SFX A r rision/L [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A r rision/L [adiopt]ronar
SFX A r rision/L [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A r rision/L [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A r rision/L [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A r rision/L [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A r rision/L [aeinu]kir
SFX A r rision/L [aeio]strar
SFX A r rision/L [aeiop]letar
SFX A r rision/L [aeiou]nir
SFX A r rision/L [aeiou]xenar
SFX A r rision/L [aeiru]ñar
SFX A r rision/L [aeiu]bir
SFX A r rision/L [aeiu]ngar
SFX A r rision/L [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A r rision/L [aelo]var
SFX A r rision/L [aenoux]golar
SFX A r rision/L [aeo]liar
SFX A r rision/L [aeors]tiđar
SFX A r rision/L [aeou]mentar
SFX A r rision/L [agot]rejar
SFX A r rision/L [ai]erar
SFX A r rision/L [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A r rision/L [ail]gar
SFX A r rision/L [ailnou]sar
SFX A r rision/L [ailnu]bar
SFX A r rision/L [ailu]minar
SFX A r rision/L [aiou]rmar
SFX A r rision/L [aiou]ñir
SFX A r rision/L [aisu]kiar
SFX A r rision/L [aku]rifegar
