public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
abokadar/A
albitrar/A
alteriđar/A
traxandar/A
apaltar/A
argomentar/A
arxarar/A
ativar/A
aumentar/A
inaxiar/A
badajar/A
xbajafar/A
balar/A
inbalegar/A
xbalordir/A
inbalukar/A
kontrabandonar/A
xbarar/A
barbajar/A
barlúxer/A
basilar/A
batiđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
dexbavarar/A
baxotar/A
xbekotar/A
xberlumar/A
xbetegar/A
inbiankar/A
inbiavar/A
abinar/A
inbiondir/A
biskar/A
blaterar/A
inboɉar/A
inbokar/A
bolar/A
abonar/A
bonbardar/A
xborar/A
xboroŧar/A
dexbotir/A
xbotonar/A
inboxemar/A
bragolar/A
dexbranar/A
abraŧar/A
breviar/A
brindar/A
inbrojar/A
inbrokar/A
brontolar/A
bruskar/A
buelar/A
busar/A
inbuŧolar/A
buxnar/A
scapar/A
incavar/A
censir/A
recèñer/A
soscéñer/A
skoncetar/A
incodar/A
incukar/A
interdir/A
indanar/A
dentar/A
derokar/A
indevenar/A
distribuir/A
maledíxer/A
dolorar/A
radolŧir/A
doparar/A
dormir/A
adotar/A
indriŧar/A
kondúxer/A
đaliđar/A
đogatar/A
sorađónxer/A
skonđurar/A
ekonomiđar/A
entrar/A
erpegar/A
evínŧer/A
exerŧitar/A
dexasuefar/A
tumefar/A
infagotar/A
sfalkar/A
fameliariđar/A
infantar/A
infasar/A
faŧionar/A
fortifegar/A
palifegar/A
feliŧitar/A
defénder/A
konferir/A
inferetar/A
fetar/A
fiabar/A
sfiankonar/A
infibiar/A
resfidar/A
desfilar/A
tranfilar/A
fiokar/A
firmar/A
infiscar/A
reflèter/A
foderar/A
desfogonar/A
folar/A
infoñar/A
deskonfortar/A
raforŧar/A
frankar/A
fratar/A
desfregolar/A
sfroñar/A
ŧentrifugar/A
ofuskar/A
galeđar/A
ganbinar/A
xgarbujar/A
ingavetar/A
xgobar/A
xgorgeđar/A
ingranar/A
ingrapeɉar/A
ingravidar/A
grevar/A
xgríxer/A
gruñar/A
guarentar/A
reguxar/A
indovinar/A
inpaxar/A
interiŧir/A
istansiar/A
inɉarar/A
xɉinŧar/A
inkadenar/A
interkalar/A
inkalmar/A
kamufar/A
kandidar/A
skanpanotar/A
kapeɉar/A
karakolar/A
inkarir/A
skarteđar/A
inkaspar/A
inkatifar/A
kauŧionar/A
akaxar/A
inkodegar/A
kokonar/A
inkolpar/A
komunegar/A
konkuasar/A
konsultar/A
akonŧar/A
dekórer/A
konkordar/A
koronar/A
inkotir/A
kòxer/A
kriar/A
krostar/A
kuadrar/A
inkuerar/A
rekuixir/A
inkuñar/A
skuxar/A
languidir/A
relasar/A
inlear/A
xlenguaŧar/A
aleviar/A
dexligar/A
xlisar/A
dexlojar/A
lotar/A
lúxer/A
magonar/A
permaner/A
xmanetar/A
xmañuŧar/A
marixar/A
inmascar/A
xmatiđar/A
maxerar/A
inmelar/A
dexmentegar/A
mestierar/A
skométer/A
ministrar/A
remodernar/A
mòlđer/A
stramontar/A
amorbidir/A
stramortir/A
promòver/A
muɉar/A
mustagar/A
inmuxonir/A
naxar/A
nevegar/A
noɉar/A
nudrir/A
ñokolar/A
inokar/A
abondar/A
dexorbar/A
ormeđar/A
ostinar/A
padriđar/A
spakar/A
spaludar/A
konpaneđar/A
spapar/A
reaparir/A
inpartir/A
repasar/A
pastroŧar/A
strapaŧar/A
paxentar/A
inpelar/A
spenar/A
penetrar/A
despeocar/A
inperlar/A
apetir/A
espetorar/A
inpiagar/A
piatonar/A
inpikar/A
pionbar/A
inpironar/A
spiŧegar/A
replikar/A
poltroniđar/A
inpóner/A
inpongar/A
spontiđar/A
konportar/A
postilar/A
spovolar/A
represtinar/A
inprimar/A
prosimar/A
puñalar/A
spuŧolir/A
rakordar/A
ranciñar/A
irapar/A
ravanar/A
xregolar/A
reŧitar/A
riduŧar/A
roar/A
rokir/A
rondar/A
inrosar/A
rubregar/A
ruñir/A
sabionar/A
deskonsakrar/A
asaltar/A
sanguenar/A
sasinar/A
scànxer/A
sekar/A
segregar/A
asegurar/A
semenar/A
disentir/A
separar/A
sestar/A
sfriđegar/A
simar/A
asíster/A
skalpolar/A
skaraventar/A
inskaturir/A
skiŧar/A
skotar/A
skrutinar/A
soler/A
solfiđar/A
insonolir/A
resòrxer/A
sparlacar/A
spedir/A
prospetar/A
spionar/A
despoɉar/A
spuacar/A
destafar/A
stangar/A
instekar/A
restimar/A
istiŧar/A
instornir/A
straŧar/A
stringar/A
strufiñar/A
destuđar/A
suefar/A
supar/A
tabakar/A
staɉuŧar/A
takonar/A
intantar/A
tarmar/A
tavaneđar/A
tèmer/A
inténđer/A
atentar/A
asteñir/A
detèñer/A
astéñer/A
soterar/A
kontestar/A
tintinar/A
tiviar/A
destonar/A
tontonar/A
tornir/A
tòser/A
protràer/A
tragar/A
trarar/A
traŧar/A
stremir/A
trigar/A
trivelar/A
trufar/A
turgar/A
ŧaponar/A
inŧefar/A
ŧercar/A
inŧetar/A
inŧiganar/A
manŧipar/A
inŧolar/A
ujar/A
uxar/A
vageđar/A
rinvangar/A
vareŧar/A
ravéder/A
revelir/A
vendemar/A
arveñir/A
vèñer/A
revèñer/A
vergoñar/A
inversiar/A
verxurar/A
vexetar/A
vinar/A
inviscar/A
vixionar/A
vokaliđar/A
voltolar/A
revòlxer/A
rexarsir/A
xborñar/A
xèmer/A
xgorlar/A
xmarir/A
xolar/A
